Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-8]
Authorization to operate in the State; private college or university. (a) To operate in the State, a private
college or university shall:

(1) Be party to a reciprocity agreement to which the
State is a member; or

(2) Apply for, on a form prescribed by the
department, and receive authorization from the director; provided that the
private college or university meets the requirements of section 305J-14;
provided further that a private college or university shall apply for and
obtain a separate authorization for each campus, branch, or site that is
separately accredited. A separate authorization shall not be required for
additional professional accreditations. A private, nonprofit college or
university shall submit verification of its nonprofit status with its
application.

(b)
Upon receiving an application for authorization, the director shall review the application to confirm that the private college or university is accredited. The director shall not approve an application from a private college or
university that, in the two years preceding submission of the application,
has:

(1) Had its accreditation suspended or withdrawn;

(2) Been prohibited from operating in another state;
or

(3) Substantially the same owners, governing board,
or principal officers as a private college or university that has:

(A) Had its accreditation suspended or
withdrawn; or

(B) Been prohibited from operating in another
state.

(c)
To operate in the State, a private college or university shall be accredited on
the basis of an on-site review.

(d) A private college or university shall notify the department within
thirty days of any material information related to an action
by the institution's accrediting body concerning the institution's
accreditation status, including but not limited to reaffirmation or loss of
accreditation, approval of a request for change, a campus evaluation visit, a
focused visit, or approval of additional locations. In addition, the
institution shall immediately notify the department if the institution's
accrediting body is no longer recognized by the United States Department of
Education.

(e) A private college or university under the
jurisdiction of the department shall notify the department at least one year
prior to its ceasing of operations in the State.

(f) A private college or university authorized pursuant to this
chapter shall pay any and all fees established pursuant to section 305J-18. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next